Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1004
Funding; application; grants; section, how construed.

(1) Any natural resources district, political subdivision, other public agency, or private nonprofit organization whose primary purpose is the purchase, development, or maintenance of a recreational trail within the state or any combination thereof may apply to the Game and Parks Commission for funding to assist in the purchase, development, and maintenance of a recreational trail within the state.

(2) The commission shall provide funds to a qualified applicant from the Trail Development Assistance Fund. The funds shall be disbursed to a qualified applicant as a lump-sum grant to be used as matching funds for no more than fifty percent of the total anticipated cost. This section shall not be construed to prevent agreements pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or any other agreement either before or after the application is submitted for the grant. Qualified applicants who have submitted their completed applications within sixty days following September 6, 1991, shall receive their disbursements by January 1, 1992.

(3) No real property, leased property, easement, right-of-way, or other property interest which is owned, controlled, managed, or maintained by the commission on September 6, 1991, may be the subject of a grant application under this section.

Laws 1991, LB 714, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1504;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 379.
January 1, 2010
Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.